District of Columbia statutes.
2-577

Meeting procedures.

(a)

A meeting may be held by video conference, telephone conference, or other electronic means; provided, that:

(1)

Reasonable arrangements are made to accommodate the public’s right to attend the meeting;

(2)

The meeting is recorded; and

(3)

All votes are taken by roll call.

(b)

All provisions of this subchapter shall apply to electronic meetings.

(c)

E-mail exchanges between members of a public body shall not constitute an electronic meeting.

(d)

When an emergency meeting is convened, the presiding officer shall open the meeting with a statement explaining the subject of the meeting, the nature of the emergency, and how public notice was provided.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 407
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734